New York, session 2025-2026, A8820.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 3 of section 99-ii of the 2 state finance law, as added by chapter 92 of the laws of 2021, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (b) Reasonable costs incurred by the office of cannabis management and 5 the cannabis control board for implementing, administering, and enforc- 6 ing the marihuana regulation and taxation act, including, but not limit- 7 ed to, the cost of implementing a track and trace program with a unique 8 package identifier. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "package" 9 shall mean a single regulatory identification number, whether repres- 10 ented by alphanumeric characters, symbols, a barcode, or a QR code, 11 applied to all line items on a shipping manifest. Further, for the 12 purposes of this paragraph, the term "line items" shall mean cases of 13 products, and shall expressly exclude any unique identifiers assigned to 14 the individual product units contained within such cases. 15 § 2. Section 78 of the cannabis law is amended to read as follows: 16 § 78. Record keeping and tracking. 1. The board shall, by regulation, 17 require each licensee pursuant to this article to adopt and maintain 18 security, tracking, record keeping, record retention and surveillance 19 systems, relating to all cannabis at every stage of acquiring, 20 possession, manufacture, sale, delivery, transporting, testing or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10699-05-6 A. 8820--B 2 1 distributing by the licensee, subject to regulations of the board. 2 Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board shall not 3 require a licensee to track, record, or maintain data for individual 4 product units beyond a package level. For purposes of this subdivision, 5 the term "package" shall mean a single regulatory identification number, 6 whether represented by alphanumeric characters, symbols, a barcode, or a 7 QR code, applied to all line items on a shipping manifest. Further, for 8 the purposes of this subdivision, the term "line items" shall mean cases 9 of products, and shall expressly exclude any unique identifiers assigned 10 to the individual product item contained within such cases. 11 2. Every licensee shall keep and maintain upon the licensed premises, 12 adequate books and records of all transactions involving the licensee 13 and sale of its products with a unique package identifier, which shall 14 include, but is not limited to, all information required by any rules 15 promulgated by the board. Such regulations may require the utilization 16 of an approved seed-to-sale tracking system compiling a licensee's 17 cannabis inventory and transaction data. Compliance with the record 18 keeping requirements of this subdivision shall be deemed satisfied by 19 the maintenance of records at the package level and the board shall not 20 require licensees to utilize an additional unique identifier on each 21 individual item contained within such packages. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.